Alabama, session 2026rs, SB266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
In Covington County, no person may inject, store, or
sequester carbon dioxide in underground wells. This
prohibition includes the operation of a Class VI well as
defined by the United States Environmental Protection Agency
pursuant to the Underground Injection Control Program of the
Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq.
Page 1

Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq.
SB266 INTRODUCED
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to Covington County, proposing an amendment
to the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to prohibit the
injection and storage of carbon dioxide in underground wells
in the county.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
Page 2

part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
SB266 INTRODUCED
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 3